Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3950
Legislative findings.

The Legislature declares it to be in the public interest that producers in Nebraska be permitted and encouraged to maintain and expand domestic sales of milk and dairy products, develop new products and new markets, improve methods and practices relating to marketing or processing of milk and dairy products, and inform and educate consumers of sound nutritional principles including the role of milk in a balanced diet. It is the purpose of the Dairy Industry Development Act to provide the authorization and to prescribe the necessary procedures by which the dairy industry in Nebraska may finance programs to achieve the purposes expressed in this section. The Nebraska Dairy Industry Development Board shall be the agency of the State of Nebraska for such purpose.

Laws 1992, LB 275, § 3.